Wisconsin, session 2025, AB419.
do enact as follows:AB419,13Section 1. 77.54 (58) of the statutes is renumbered 77.54 (58) (a).AB419,24Section 2. 77.54 (58) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB419,2,4177.54 (58) (b) The sales price from the sale of and the storage, use, or other 2consumption of ski lifts and machines and equipment used exclusively to operate 3the ski lifts, including accessories, attachments, and parts for the ski lifts, 4machines, and equipment.AB419,35Section 3. Effective date.AB419,2,76(1) Ski lifts. The renumbering of s. 77.54 (58) and the creation of s. 77.54 7(58) (b) take effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after publication.AB419,2,88